West Virginia, session 2026, HB4596.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16. Federal Immigration Enforcement. §15-16-10. Denial of state funds; rule-making authority. (a) A state entity, local entity or law enforcement agency may not receive state funds if the entity adopts or maintains a policy in violation of this article and does not come into compliance with this article within 90 days of receiving notice. (b) State funds for a state entity, local entity, or law enforcement agency shall be denied for the state fiscal year following the year in which a final judicial determination in an action brought under §15-16-5 of this code is made that the entity has intentionally violated this article. (c) The State Auditor shall adopt rules to implement this section among state agencies from which state funds are distributed to a municipality or county pursuant to §29A-3-1 et seq. of this code.